Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB601.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 9.6. Ivermectin Without Prescription or Consultation with Health Care Professional.-- (a) Ivermectin suitable for human use may be sold or purchased as an over-the-counter medication in this Commonwealth without a prescription or consultation with a health care professional.(b) As used in this section, the term "over-the-counter medication" means medication that may be legally sold and purchased without a prescription.1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0601PN0654 - 2 - 1